Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB945.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2168. Prohibiting the purchase, sale, offer for sale or possession with intent to sell covered animal parts or products.(a) Offense defined.--Except as provided under subsection (b), no person may purchase, sell, offer to sell or possess with intent to sell any item that the person knows or should know is a covered animal part or product.(b) Exceptions.--Unless prohibited under Federal law or section 2167 (relating to endangered or threatened species), the prohibition under subsection (a) shall not apply:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) To an employee or agent of the Federal or State Government undertaking a law enforcement activity pursuant to Federal or State law or a mandatory duty required by Federal or State law.(2) When the activity is expressly authorized by Federal law.(3) When the covered animal part or product is a fixed component of an antique that is not made wholly or primarily of the covered animal part or product if:(i) the antique status is established by the owner or seller of the covered animal part or product with documentation evidencing provenance and showing the covered animal part or product to be not less than 100 years old; and(ii) the total weight of the covered animal part or product is less than 200 grams.(4) When the covered animal part or product is a fixed component of a musical instrument, including string instruments and bows, wind and percussion instruments and pianos, if:(i) the covered animal part or product was legally acquired; and(ii) the total weight of the covered animal part or product is less than 200 grams.(5) To a covered animal part or product to which the commission has granted a permit under subsection (c).(c) Educational or scientific use.--The commission may permit, under terms and conditions as the commission may prescribe, the purchase, sale, offer for sale or possession with intent to sell a covered animal part or product for educational 20250SB0945PN1066 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or scientific purposes by a bona fide educational or scientific institution if the covered animal part or product was legally acquired.(d) Presumption of possession with intent to sell.--There is a presumption of possession with intent to sell a covered animal part or product when the part or product is possessed by a retail or wholesale establishment or other forum engaged in the business of buying or selling similar items. This rebuttable presumption shall not preclude a finding of intent to sell on any other evidence which may serve to independently establish such intent.(e) Penalties.--A person who violates subsection (a) shall be subject to the following civil penalties:(1) For a first violation where the total value of the covered animal part or product does not exceed $250, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $5,000.(2) For a first violation where the total value of the covered animal part or product exceeds $250, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000.(3) For a second or subsequent violation where the total value of the covered animal part or product does not exceed $250, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000.(4) For a second or subsequent violation where the total value of the covered animal part or product exceeds $250, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $20,000.(f) Disposition.--The commission may seize a covered animal part or product involved in a violation of this section in 20250SB0945PN1066 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with law and upon legal disposition the covered animal part or product may be:(1) maintained by the commission for educational or training purposes;(2) donated by the commission to a bona fide educational or scientific institution; or(3) destroyed.(g) Regulations.--The commission shall promulgate regulations necessary and appropriate for the implementation and enforcement of this section.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bona fide educational or scientific institution." An institution that establishes through documentation educational or scientific tax exemption from the Federal Internal Revenue Service."Covered animal." Any species of:(1) Baleen whale (Parvorder: Mysticeti).(2) Bonobo (Pan paniscus).(3) Cheetah (Acinonyx jubatus).(4) Chimpanzee (Pan troglodytes).(5) Dolphin, porpoise or toothed whale (Parvorder: Odontoceti).(6) Elephant (Family: Elephantidae).(7) Giraffe (Genus: Giraffa).(8) Gorilla (Genus: Gorilla).(9) Hippopotamus (Family: Hippopotamidae).(10) Jaguar (Panthera onca).(11) Leopard (Panthera pardus).20250SB0945PN1066 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) Lion (Panthera leo).(13) Mammoth (Genus: Mammuthus).(14) Mastodon (Genus: Mammut).(15) Orangutan (Genus: Pongo).(16) Panda (Ailuropoda melanoleuca).(17) Pangolin (Genus: Manidae).(18) Polar bear (Ursus maritimus).(19) Ray (Superorder: Batoidea).(20) Rhinoceros (Family: Rhinocerotidae).(21) Sea turtle (Superfamily: Chelonioidea).(22) Shark (Order: Hexanchiformes, Echinorhiniformes, Squaliformes, Pristiophoriformes, Squatiniformes, Heterodontiformes, Lamniformes, Orectolobiformes, Carcharhiniformes).(23) Tiger (Panthera tigris).(24) Walrus (Odobenus rosmarus)."Covered animal part or product." An item that contains, or is wholly or partially made from, any covered animal. The term includes gametes and DNA."Sale" or "sell." An act of selling, trading or bartering for monetary or nonmonetary consideration. The term includes any transfer of ownership that occurs in the course of a commercial transaction, but does not include a nonmonetary transfer of ownership by way of gift, donation or bequest. For purposes of this section, a sale shall be deemed to occur in this Commonwealth if:(1) the buyer takes physical possession of the covered animal part or product in this Commonwealth; or(2) the seller is located in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250SB0945PN1066 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930